Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 5
DELEGATES

7-126-501. Delegates.

A nonprofit corporation may provide in its bylaws for delegates having some or all of the authority of members.

The bylaws may state provisions relating to:

The characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations, and obligations of delegates, including their selection and removal;

Calling, noticing, holding, and conducting meetings of delegates; and

Carrying on corporate activities during and between meetings of delegates.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 674, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

IP(2) amended, p. 2338, § 293, effective July 1, 2004.